test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-teltta_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:


  Noun - teltta: # a-stems 
  #Eromâš sujâttem, saahâ nuorâ lovnâsäänist
    teltta+N+Sg+Nom: teltta
    teltta+N+Sg+Gen: telta
    teltta+N+Sg+Ill: teeltan
    teltta+N+Sg+Loc: telttaast
    teltta+N+Sg+Com: telttain
    teltta+N+Ess: telttan
    teltta+N+Par: telttad
    teltta+N+Pl+Nom: teltah
    teltta+N+Pl+Gen: teltai
    teltta+N+Pl+Akk: telttaid
    teltta+N+Pl+Ill: telttaid
    teltta+N+Pl+Loc: telttain
    teltta+N+Pl+Com: teltaiguin
    teltta+N+Pl+Abe: teltaittáá
